District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.72

Repealed

Merger or consolidation — Parent corporation and wholly owned subsidiary; effect of certificate of merger.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 210, ch. 269, § 72
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 16
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(y), 39 DCR 4863
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(k), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.72.
1981 Ed., § 29-372.
1973 Ed., § 29-927h.